New Mexico, session 2026, SB139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the commission on the status of women for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to increase the commission's capacity by providing for contractor assistance, additional office space and an agency database. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233170.1